Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2705
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 69-2704 to 69-2711:

(1) Brand family means all styles of cigarettes sold under the same trademark and differentiated from one another by means of additional modifiers or descriptors, including, but not limited to, menthol, lights, kings, and 100s, and includes any brand name, alone or in conjunction with any other word, trademark, logo, symbol, motto, selling message, or recognizable pattern of colors, or any other indicia of product identification identical or similar to, or identifiable with, a previously known brand of cigarettes;

(2) Cigarette has the same meaning as in section 69-2702;

(3) Cigarette inputs means any machinery or other component parts typically used in the manufacture of cigarettes, including, without limitation, tobacco whether processed or unprocessed, cigarette papers and tubes, cigarette filters or any component parts intended for use in the making of cigarette filters, and any machinery typically used in the making of cigarettes;

(4) Days has the same meaning as in section 69-2702;

(5) Directory means the directory compiled by the Tax Commissioner under section 69-2706 or, in the case of references to another state's directory, the directory compiled under the similar law in that other state;

(6) Importer has the same meaning as in section 69-2702;

(7) Indian country has the same meaning as in section 69-2702;

(8) Indian tribe has the same meaning as in section 69-2702;

(9) Master Settlement Agreement has the same meaning as in section 69-2702;

(10) Nonparticipating manufacturer means any tobacco product manufacturer that is not a participating manufacturer;

(11) Nonparticipating manufacturer cigarettes means cigarettes (a) of a brand family that is not included in the certification of a participating manufacturer under subsection (1) of section 69-2706, (b) that are subject to the escrow requirement under subdivision (2) of section 69-2703 because the participating manufacturer in whose certification the brand family is included is not generally performing its financial obligations under the Master Settlement Agreement, or (c) of a brand family of a participating manufacturer that is not otherwise listed on the directory under subsection (2) of section 69-2706;

(12) Package means any pack or other container on which a state stamp or tribal stamp could be applied consistent with and as required by sections 69-2701 to 69-2711 and 77-2601 to 77-2623 that contains one or more individual cigarettes for sale. Nothing in such sections shall alter any other applicable requirement with respect to the minimum number of cigarettes that may be contained in a pack or other container of cigarettes. References to package do not include a container of multiple packages;

(13) Participating manufacturer has the same meaning as in section II(jj) of the Master Settlement Agreement;

(14) Person means any natural person, trustee, company, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity, including any Indian tribe or instrumentality thereof;

(15) Purchase means any acquisition in any manner or by any means for any consideration. The term includes transporting or receiving product in connection with a purchase;

(16) Qualified escrow fund has the same meaning as in section 69-2702;

(17) Retailer includes retail dealers as defined in section 77-2601 or anyone who is licensed under sections 28-1420 to 28-1422;

(18) Sale or sell means any transfer, exchange, or barter in any manner or by any means for any consideration. Sale or sell includes distributing or shipping product in connection with a sale;

(19) Shortfall amount means the difference between (a) the full amount of the deposit required to be made by a nonparticipating manufacturer for a calendar quarter under section 69-2703 and (b) the sum of (i) any amounts precollected by a stamping agent and deposited into escrow for that calendar quarter on behalf of the nonparticipating manufacturer under section 69-2708.01, (ii) the amount deposited into escrow by the nonparticipating manufacturer for that calendar quarter under section 69-2703, (iii) any amounts deposited into escrow for that calendar quarter under subdivision (2)(d) of section 69-2703 by an importer on such nonparticipating manufacturer's cigarettes, and (iv) any amounts collected by the state for that calendar quarter under the bond posted by the nonparticipating manufacturer under section 69-2707.01. The shortfall amount, if any, for a nonparticipating manufacturer for a calendar quarter shall be calculated by the Attorney General within fifteen days following the date on which the state determines the amount it will collect on the bond posted by the nonparticipating manufacturer as provided in section 69-2707.01;

(20) Stamping agent means a person that is authorized to affix stamps to packages or other containers of cigarettes under section 77-2603 or 77-2603.01 or any person that is required to pay the tobacco tax imposed pursuant to section 77-4008 on roll-your-own cigarettes;

(21) Tax Commissioner means the Tax Commissioner of the State of Nebraska;

(22) Tobacco product manufacturer has the same meaning as in section 69-2702;

(23) Units sold has the same meaning as in section 69-2702; and

(24) Unstamped cigarettes means any cigarettes that are not contained in a package bearing a stamp required under section 77-2603 or 77-2603.01.

Laws 2003, LB 572, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB590, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB397, § 13;

Laws 2025, LB9, § 3.